South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S935.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Seizure first aid SECTION 1.    Chapter 1, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-1-320.    (A)(1) The Department of Public Health shall: (a) create an informational pamphlet or poster for state governmental entities on rendering evidence-based seizure first aid to an individual who has experienced a seizure in the workplace; and (b) make the informational pamphlet or poster available on its website for use by state governmental entities. (2) The informational pamphlet or poster may incorporate any available federal guidance, or guidance from nonprofit organizations that support the welfare of individuals with epilepsy and seizure disorders, concerning seizure first aid. (B) The chief executive officer of every state governmental entity shall post the informational, evidence-based pamphlet or poster on rendering seizure first aid to an individual who has experienced a seizure in the workplace in a clearly visible and accessible location frequented by employees. (C) For purposes of this section: (1) "Seizure first aid" means nonmedical procedures to respond, attend, and provide comfort and safety to a person suffering from a primary generalized tonic-clonic seizure or complex partial seizure. (2) "State governmental entity" means this State, a state agency in the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government, or a political subdivision of this State. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 19th day of May, 2026. __________